Utah statutes.
63M-1-1218.   Certificates and contingent tax credits.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the board, in consultation with the State Tax Commission, shall make
rules governing the form, issuance, transfer, and redemption of certificates.
(2)  The board's issuance of certificates and related contingent tax credits
to designated investors is subject to the following:
(a)  the aggregate outstanding certificates may not exceed a total of
$300,000,000 of contingent tax credits;
(b)  the board shall issue a certificate contemporaneously with an investment
in the Utah fund of funds by a designated investor;
(c)  the board shall issue contingent tax credits in a manner that not more
than $20,000,000 of contingent tax credits for each $100,000,000 increment of
contingent tax credits may be redeemable in any fiscal year; and
(d)  the credits are certifiable if there are insufficient funds in the
redemption reserve to make a cash redemption and the board does not exercise
its other options under Subsection 63M-1-1220(3)(b).
(3)  In determining the $300,000,000 maximum limit in Subsection (2)(a) and
the $20,000,000 limitation for each $100,000,000 increment of contingent tax
credits in Subsection (2)(c):
(a)  the board shall use the cumulative amount of scheduled aggregate returns
on certificates issued by the board to designated investors;
(b)  certificates and related contingent tax credits which have expired may
not be included; and
(c)  certificates and related contingent tax credits which have been redeemed
shall be included only to the extent of tax credits actually allowed.
(4)  Contingent tax credits are subject to the following:
(a)  a contingent tax credit may not be redeemed except by a designated
investor in accordance with the terms of a certificate from the board;
(b)  a contingent tax credit may not be redeemed prior to the time the Utah
fund of funds receives full payment from the designated investor for the
certificate;
(c)  a contingent tax credit shall be claimed for a tax year that begins
during the calendar year maturity date stated on the certificate;
(d)  an investor who redeems a certificate and the related contingent tax
credit shall allocate the amount of the contingent tax credit to the taxpayers
of the investor based on the taxpayer's pro rata share of the investor's
earnings; and
(e)  a contingent tax credit shall be claimed as a refundable credit.
(5)  In calculating the amount of a contingent tax credit:
(a)  the board shall certify a contingent tax credit only if the actual return
or payment of principal and interest to the designated investor is less than
that targeted at the issuance of the certificate;
(b)  the amount of the contingent tax credit for a designated investor with an
equity interest may not exceed the difference between:
(i)  the sum of:
(A)  the initial private investment of the designated investor in the Utah
fund of funds; and
(B)  the scheduled aggregate return to the designated investor at rates of
return authorized by the board at the issuance of the certificate; and
(ii)  the aggregate actual return received by the designated investor and any
predecessor in interest of the initial equity investment and interest on the
initial equity investment;
(c)  the rates, whether fixed rates or variable rates, shall be determined by
a formula stipulated in the certificate; and
(d)  the amount of the contingent tax credit for a designated investor with a
loan or other debt obligation from the Utah fund of funds shall be equal to
the amount of any principal, interest, or interest equivalent unpaid at the
redemption of the loan or other obligation, as stipulated in the certificate.
(6)  The board shall clearly indicate on the certificate:
(a)  the targeted return on the invested capital, if the private investment is
an equity interest;
(b)  the payment schedule of principal, interest, or interest equivalent, if
the private investment is a loan or other debt obligation;
(c)  the amount of the initial private investment;
(d)  the calculation formula for determining the scheduled aggregate return on
the initial equity investment, if applicable; and
(e)  the calculation formula for determining the amount of the contingent tax
credit that may be claimed.
(7)  Once moneys are invested by a designated investor, the certificate:
(a)  is binding on the board; and
(b)  may not be modified, terminated, or rescinded.
(8)  Funds invested by a designated investor for a certificate shall be paid
to the corporation for placement in the Utah fund of funds.
(9)  The State Tax Commission may, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and in consultation with the board, make
rules to help implement this section.
